California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
“Abduction” means the removal from this state and the restraint from returning to this state, or the restraint from returning to this state, of any elder or dependent adult who does not have the capacity to consent to the removal from this state and the restraint from returning to this state, or the restraint from returning to this state, as well as the removal from this state or the restraint from returning to this state, of any conservatee without the consent of the conservator or the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 663, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.07.

(a) “Abuse of an elder or a dependent adult” means any of the following:

(1) Physical abuse, neglect, abandonment, isolation, abduction, or other treatment with resulting physical harm or pain or mental suffering.

(2) The deprivation by a care custodian of goods or services that are necessary to avoid physical harm or mental suffering.

(3) Financial abuse, as defined in Section 15610.30.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 285, Sec. 2.   (SB 196)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.10.

“Adult protective services” means those activities performed on behalf of elders and dependent adults who have come to the attention
 of the adult protective services agency due to potential abuse or neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 63.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.13.

“Adult protective services agency” means a county welfare department, except persons who do not work directly with elders or dependent adults as part of their official duties, including members of support staff and maintenance staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.15.

“Division” means the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse within the office of the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 554, Sec. 13.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.17.

“Care custodian” means an administrator or an employee of any of the following public or private facilities or agencies, or persons providing care or services for elders or dependent adults, including members of the support staff and maintenance staff:

(a) Twenty-four-hour health facilities, as defined in Sections 1250, 1250.2, and 1250.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Clinics.

(c) Home health agencies.

(d) Agencies providing publicly funded in-home supportive services, nutrition services, or other home and community-based support services.

(e) Adult day health care centers and adult day care.

(f) Secondary schools that serve 18- to 22-year-old dependent adults and postsecondary educational institutions that serve dependent adults or elders.

(g) Independent living centers.

(h) Camps.

(i) Alzheimer’s Disease day care resource centers.

(j) Community care facilities, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, and residential care facilities for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) Respite care facilities.

(l) Foster homes.

(m) Vocational rehabilitation facilities and work activity centers.

(n) Designated area agencies on aging.

(o) Regional centers for persons with developmental disabilities.

(p) State Department of Social Services and State Department of Health Services licensing divisions.

(q) County welfare departments.

(r) Offices of patients’ rights advocates and clients’ rights advocates, including attorneys.

(s) The office of the long-term care ombudsman.

(t) Offices of public conservators, public guardians, and court investigators.

(u) Any protection or advocacy agency or entity that is designated by the Governor to fulfill the requirements and assurances of the following:

(1) The federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, contained in Chapter 144 (commencing with Section 15001) of Title 42 of the United States Code, for protection and advocacy of the rights of persons with developmental disabilities.

(2) The Protection and Advocacy for the Mentally Ill Individuals Act of 1986, as amended, contained in Chapter 114 (commencing with Section 10801) of Title 42 of the United States Code, for the protection and advocacy of the rights of persons with mental illness.

(v) Humane societies and animal control agencies.

(w) Fire departments.

(x) Offices of environmental health and building code enforcement.

(y) Any other protective, public, sectarian, mental health, or private assistance or advocacy agency or person providing health services or social services to elders or dependent adults.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.19.

“Clergy member” means a priest, minister, rabbi, religious practitioner, or similar functionary of a church, synagogue, temple, mosque, or recognized religious denomination or organization. “Clergy member” does not include unpaid volunteers whose principal occupation or vocation does not involve active or ordained ministry in a church, synagogue, temple, mosque, or recognized religious denomination or organization, and who periodically visit elder or dependent adults on behalf of that church, synagogue, temple, mosque, or recognized religious denomination or organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.20.

“Clients’ rights advocate” means the individual or individuals assigned by a regional center or state hospital developmental center to be responsible for clients’ rights assurance for persons with developmental disabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.23.

(a) “Dependent adult” means a person, regardless of whether the person lives independently, between the ages of 18 and 64 years who resides in this state and who has physical or mental limitations that restrict his or her ability to carry out normal activities or to protect his or her rights, including, but not limited to, persons who have physical or developmental disabilities, or whose physical or mental abilities have diminished because of age.

(b) “Dependent adult” includes any person between the ages of 18 and 64 years who is admitted as an inpatient to a 24-hour health facility, as defined in Sections 1250, 1250.2, and 1250.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 70, Sec. 5.   (AB 1934)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.25.

“Developmentally disabled person” means a person with a developmental disability specified by or as described in subdivision (a) of Section 4512.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.27.

“Elder” means any person residing in this state, 65 years of age or older.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.30.

(a) “Financial abuse” of an elder or dependent adult occurs when a person or entity does any of the following:

(1) Takes, secretes, appropriates, obtains, or retains real or personal property of an elder or dependent adult for a wrongful use or with intent to defraud, or both.

(2) Assists in taking, secreting, appropriating, obtaining, or retaining real or personal property of an elder or dependent adult for a wrongful use or with intent to defraud, or both.

(3) Takes, secretes, appropriates, obtains, or retains, or assists in
 taking, secreting, appropriating, obtaining, or retaining, real or personal property of an elder or dependent adult by undue influence, as defined in Section 15610.70.

(b) A person or entity shall be deemed to have taken, secreted, appropriated, obtained, or retained property for a wrongful use if, among other things, the person or entity takes, secretes, appropriates, obtains, or retains the property and the person or entity knew or should have known that this conduct is likely to be harmful to the elder or dependent adult.

(c) For purposes of this section, a person or entity takes, secretes, appropriates, obtains, or retains real or personal property when an elder or dependent adult is deprived of any property right, including by means of an agreement, donative transfer, or
 testamentary bequest, regardless of whether the property is held directly or by a representative of an elder or dependent adult.

(d) For purposes of this section, “representative” means a person or entity that is either of the following:

(1) A conservator, trustee, or other representative of the estate of an elder or dependent adult.

(2) An attorney-in-fact of an elder or dependent adult who acts within the authority of the power of attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 668, Sec. 2.   (AB 140)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.35.

“Goods and services necessary to avoid physical harm or mental suffering” include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The provision of medical care for physical and mental health needs.

(b) Assistance in personal hygiene.

(c) Adequate clothing.

(d) Adequately heated and ventilated shelter.

(e) Protection from health and safety hazards.

(f) Protection from malnutrition, under those circumstances where the results include, but are not limited to, malnutrition and deprivation of necessities or physical punishment.

(g) Transportation and assistance necessary to secure any of the needs set forth in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.37.

“Health practitioner” means a physician and surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist, dentist, resident, intern, podiatrist, chiropractor, registered nurse, dental hygienist, licensed clinical social worker or associate clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist, licensed professional clinical counselor, or any other person who is currently licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, any emergency medical technician I or II, paramedic, or person certified pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code, a psychological assistant registered pursuant to Section 2913 of the Business and Professions Code, a marriage and family therapist trainee, as defined in subdivision (c)
 of Section 4980.03 of the Business and Professions Code, an unlicensed marriage and family therapist intern registered under Section 4980.44 of the Business and Professions Code, a clinical counselor trainee, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 4999.12 of the Business and Professions Code, a clinical counselor intern registered under Section 4999.42 of the Business and Professions Code, a state or county public health or social service employee who treats an elder or a dependent adult for any condition, a coroner, or a substance use disorder counselor. As used in this section, a “substance use disorder counselor” is a person providing
 counseling services in an alcoholism or drug abuse recovery and treatment program licensed, certified, or funded under Part 2 (commencing with Section 11760) of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (AB 575)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.39.

“Imminent danger” means a substantial probability that an elder or dependent adult is in imminent or immediate risk of death or serious physical harm, through either his or her own action or inaction, or as a result of the action or inaction of another person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.40.

“Investigation” means that activity undertaken to determine the validity of a report of elder or dependent adult abuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.43.

(a) “Isolation” means any of the following:

(1) Acts intentionally committed for the purpose of preventing, and that do serve to prevent, an elder or dependent adult from receiving his or her mail or telephone calls.

(2) Telling a caller or prospective visitor that an elder or dependent adult is not present, or does not wish to talk with the caller, or does not wish to meet with the visitor where the statement is false, is contrary to the express wishes of the elder or the dependent adult, whether he or she is competent or not, and is made for the purpose of preventing the elder or dependent adult from having contact with family, friends, or concerned persons.

(3) False imprisonment, as defined in Section 236 of the Penal Code.

(4) Physical restraint of an elder or dependent adult, for the purpose of preventing the elder or dependent adult from meeting with visitors.

(b) The acts set forth in subdivision (a) shall be subject to a rebuttable presumption that they do not constitute isolation if they are performed pursuant to the instructions of a physician and surgeon licensed to practice medicine in the state, who is caring for the elder or dependent adult at the time the instructions are given, and who gives the instructions as part of his or her medical care.

(c) The acts set forth in subdivision (a) shall not constitute isolation if they are performed in response to a reasonably perceived threat of danger to property or physical safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.45.

“Local law enforcement agency” means a city police or county sheriff’s department, or a county probation department, except persons who do not work directly with elders or dependent adults as part of their official duties, including members of support staff and maintenance staff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.47.

“Long-term care facility” means any of the following:

(a) Any long-term health care facility, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Any community care facility, as defined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, whether licensed or unlicensed.

(c) Any swing bed in an acute care facility, or any extended care facility.

(d) Any adult day health care facility as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1570.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Any residential care facility for the elderly as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.50.

“Long-term care ombudsman” means the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, local ombudsman coordinators, and other persons currently certified as ombudsmen by the Department of Aging as described in Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 9700) of Division 8.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 54, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.53.

“Mental suffering” means fear, agitation, confusion, severe depression, or other forms of serious emotional distress that is brought about by forms of intimidating behavior, threats, harassment, or by deceptive acts performed or false or misleading statements made with malicious intent to agitate, confuse, frighten, or cause severe depression or serious emotional distress of the elder or dependent adult.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 559, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.55.

(a) “Multidisciplinary personnel team” means any team of two or more persons who are trained in the prevention, identification, management, or treatment of abuse of elderly or dependent adults and who are qualified to provide a broad range of services related to abuse of elderly or dependent adults.

(b) A multidisciplinary personnel team may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Psychiatrists, psychologists, or other trained counseling personnel.

(2) Police officers or other law enforcement
 agents, including district attorneys.

(3) Health practitioners, as defined in Section 15610.37.

(4) Social workers with experience or training in prevention of abuse of elderly or dependent adults.

(5) Public
 guardians, public conservators, or public administrators.

(6) The local long-term care ombudsman.

(7) Child welfare services personnel.

(8) Representatives of a health plan.

(9) Housing representatives.

(10) County counsel.

(11) A person with expertise in finance or accounting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 64.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.57.

(a) “Neglect” means either of the following:

(1) The negligent failure of any person having the care or custody of an elder or a dependent adult to exercise that degree of care that a reasonable person in a like position would exercise.

(2) The negligent failure of an elder or dependent adult to exercise that degree of self care that a reasonable person in a like position would exercise.

(b) Neglect includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Failure to assist in personal hygiene, or in the provision of food,
 clothing, or shelter.

(2) Failure to provide medical care for physical and mental health needs.
 A person shall not be deemed neglected or abused for the sole reason that the person voluntarily relies on treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone in lieu of medical treatment.

(3) Failure to protect from health and safety hazards.

(4) Failure to prevent malnutrition or dehydration.

(5) Substantial inability or failure of an elder or dependent adult to manage their own finances. 

(6) Failure of an elder or dependent adult to satisfy any of the needs specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, for themselves as a result of poor cognitive functioning, mental limitation, substance abuse, or chronic poor health.

(c) Neglect includes being homeless if the elder or dependent adult is also unable to meet any of the needs specified in
 paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 65.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.60.

“Patients’ rights advocate” means a person who has no direct or indirect clinical or administrative responsibility for the patient, and who is responsible for ensuring that laws, regulations, and policies on the rights of the patient are observed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.63.

“Physical abuse” means any of the following:

(a) Assault, as defined in Section 240 of the Penal Code.

(b) Battery, as defined in Section 242 of the Penal Code.

(c) Assault with a deadly weapon or force likely to produce great bodily injury, as defined in Section 245 of the Penal Code.

(d) Unreasonable physical constraint, or prolonged or continual deprivation of food or water.

(e) Sexual assault, that means any of the following:

(1) Sexual battery, as defined in
 Section 243.4 of the Penal Code.

(2) Rape, as defined in Section 261 of the Penal Code, or former Section 262 of the Penal Code.

(3) Rape in concert, as described in Section 264.1 of the Penal Code.

(4) Incest, as defined in Section 285 of the Penal Code.

(5) Sodomy, as defined in Section 286 of the Penal Code.

(6) Oral copulation, as defined in Section 287 or former Section 288a of the Penal Code.

(7) Sexual penetration, as defined in Section 289 of the Penal Code.

(8) Lewd or lascivious acts, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 288 of the
 Penal Code.

(f) Use of a physical or chemical restraint or psychotropic medication under any of the following conditions:

(1) For punishment.

(2) For a period beyond that for which the medication was ordered pursuant to the instructions of a physician and surgeon licensed in the State of California, who is providing medical care to the elder or dependent adult at the time the instructions are given.

(3) For any purpose not authorized by the physician and surgeon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 39.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.65.

“Reasonable suspicion” means an objectively reasonable suspicion that a person would entertain, based upon facts that could cause a reasonable person in a like position, drawing when appropriate upon his or her training and experience, to suspect abuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 594, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.67.

“Serious bodily injury” means an injury involving extreme physical pain, substantial risk of death, or protracted loss or impairment of function of a bodily member, organ, or of mental faculty, or requiring medical intervention, including, but not limited to, hospitalization, surgery, or physical rehabilitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 659, Sec. 1.   (AB 40)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

15610.70.

(a) “Undue influence” means excessive persuasion that causes another person to act or refrain from acting by overcoming that person’s free will and results in inequity. In determining whether a result was produced by undue influence, all of the following shall be considered:

(1) The vulnerability of the victim. Evidence of vulnerability may include, but is not limited to, incapacity, illness, disability, injury, age, education, impaired cognitive function, emotional distress, isolation, or dependency, and whether the influencer knew or should have known of the alleged
 victim’s vulnerability.

(2) The influencer’s apparent authority. Evidence of apparent authority may include, but is not limited to, status as a fiduciary, family member, care provider, health care professional, legal professional, spiritual adviser, expert, or other qualification.

(3) The actions or tactics used by the influencer. Evidence of actions or tactics used may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Controlling necessaries of life, medication, the victim’s interactions with others, access to information, or sleep.

(B) Use of affection, intimidation, or coercion.

(C) Initiation of changes in personal or property rights, use of haste or secrecy in effecting those changes, effecting changes at inappropriate times and places, and claims of expertise in effecting changes.

(4) The equity of the result. Evidence of the equity of the result may include, but is not limited to, the economic consequences to the victim, any divergence from the victim’s prior intent or course of conduct or dealing, the relationship of the value conveyed to the value of any services or consideration received, or the appropriateness of the change in light of the length and nature of the relationship. 

(b) Evidence of an inequitable result, without more, is not sufficient to prove undue influence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 668, Sec. 3.   (AB 140)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Mandatory and Nonmandatory Reports of Abuse [15630. - 15632.]

15630.

(a) A person who has assumed full or intermittent responsibility for the care or custody of an elder or dependent adult, whether or not they receive compensation, including administrators, supervisors, and any licensed staff of a public or private facility that provides care or services for elder or dependent adults, or any elder or dependent adult care custodian, health practitioner, clergy member, or employee of a county adult protective services agency or a local law enforcement agency, is a mandated reporter.

(b) (1) A mandated reporter who, in their professional capacity, or within the scope of their employment, has observed or has knowledge of an incident that reasonably appears to be physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63,
 abandonment, abduction, isolation, financial abuse, or neglect, or is told by an elder or dependent adult that they have experienced behavior, including an act or omission, constituting physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63, abandonment, abduction, isolation, financial abuse, or neglect, or reasonably suspects that abuse, shall report the known, suspected, or alleged instance of abuse by telephone or through a confidential internet reporting tool, as authorized by Section 15658, immediately or as soon as practicably possible. If reported by telephone, a written report shall be sent, or an internet report shall be made through the confidential internet reporting tool established in Section 15658, within two working days.

(A) If the known, suspected, or alleged abuse occurred in a long-term care facility, except a state mental health hospital or a state developmental center, the following shall occur:

(i) If the abuse was allegedly caused by another resident of the facility with dementia diagnosed by a licensed physician and there was no serious bodily injury, the reporter shall submit a written report of the known, suspected, or alleged instance of abuse to both of the following agencies within 24 hours:

(I) The long-term care ombudsman.

(II) The local law enforcement agency.

(ii) In all other instances, immediately or as soon as practically possible, but no longer than two hours, the reporter shall submit a verbal report of the known, suspected, or alleged instance of abuse to the local law enforcement agency, and shall submit a written report to all of the following agencies within 24 hours:

(I) The long-term care ombudsman.

(II) The local law enforcement agency.

(III) The corresponding state licensing agency.

(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the time limit for reporting begins when the mandated reporter observes, obtains knowledge of, or suspects the abuse or neglect.

(B) When applicable, reports made pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) shall be deemed to satisfy the reporting requirements of the federal Elder Justice Act of 2009, as set out in Subtitle H of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), Section 1418.91 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 72541 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. When a local law enforcement agency receives an initial
 report of suspected abuse in a long-term care facility pursuant to subparagraph (A), the local law enforcement agency may coordinate efforts with the local ombudsman to provide the most immediate and appropriate response warranted to investigate the mandated report. The local ombudsman and local law enforcement agencies may collaborate to develop protocols to implement subparagraph (A).

(C) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or any other law, the department may implement subparagraphs (A) and (B), in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking regulatory action.

(D) With regard to abuse reported pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B), the local ombudsman and the local law enforcement agency shall, as
 soon as practicable, except in the case of an emergency or pursuant to a report required to be made pursuant to clause (v), in which case these actions shall be taken immediately, do all of the following:

(i) Report to the State Department of Public Health any case of known or suspected abuse occurring in a long-term health care facility, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) Report to the State Department of Social Services any case of known or suspected abuse occurring in a residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code, or in an adult day program, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iii) Report to the State Department of Public Health and the California
 Department of Aging any case of known or suspected abuse occurring in an adult day health care center, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1570.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(iv) Report to the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse any case of known or suspected criminal activity.

(v) Report all cases of known or suspected physical abuse and financial abuse to the local district attorney’s office in the county where the abuse occurred.

(E) (i) If the suspected or alleged abuse or neglect occurred in a state mental hospital or a state developmental center, and the suspected or alleged abuse or neglect resulted in any of the following incidents, a report shall be made immediately, but no later than within two hours of the mandated reporter observing, obtaining knowledge of, or
 suspecting abuse, to designated investigators of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services, and to the local law enforcement agency:

(I) A death.

(II) A sexual assault, as defined in Section 15610.63.

(III) An assault with a deadly weapon, as described in Section 245 of the Penal Code, by a nonresident of the state mental hospital or state developmental center.

(IV) An assault with force likely to produce great bodily injury, as described in Section 245 of the Penal Code.

(V) An injury to the genitals when the cause of the injury is undetermined.

(VI) A broken bone when the
 cause of the break is undetermined.

(ii) All other reports of suspected or alleged abuse or neglect that occurred in a state mental hospital or a state developmental center shall be made immediately, but no later than within two hours of the mandated reporter observing, obtaining knowledge of, or suspecting abuse, to designated investigators of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services, or to the local law enforcement agency.

(iii) When a local law enforcement agency receives an initial report of suspected or alleged abuse or neglect in a state mental hospital or a state developmental center pursuant to clause (i), the local law enforcement agency shall coordinate efforts with the designated investigators of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services to provide the most immediate and
 appropriate response warranted to investigate the mandated report. The designated investigators of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services and local law enforcement agencies may collaborate to develop protocols to implement this clause.

(iv) Except in an emergency, the local law enforcement agency shall, as soon as practicable, report any case of known or suspected criminal activity to the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse.

(v) Notwithstanding any other law, a mandated reporter who is required to report pursuant to Section 4427.5 shall not be required to report under clause (i).

(F) If the abuse has occurred in any place other than a long-term care facility, a state mental hospital, or a state developmental center, the report shall be made to the adult
 protective services agency or the local law enforcement agency.

(2) (A) A mandated reporter who is a clergy member who acquires knowledge or reasonable suspicion of elder or dependent adult abuse during a penitential communication is not subject to paragraph (1). For purposes of this subdivision, “penitential communication” means a communication that is intended to be in confidence, including, but not limited to, a sacramental confession made to a clergy member who, in the course of the discipline or practice of their church, denomination, or organization is authorized or accustomed to hear those communications and under the discipline tenets, customs, or practices of their church, denomination, or organization, has a duty to keep those communications secret.

(B) This subdivision shall not modify or limit a clergy member’s duty to report known or suspected
 elder and dependent adult abuse if they are acting in the capacity of a care custodian, health practitioner, or employee of an adult protective services agency.

(C) Notwithstanding this section, a clergy member who is not regularly employed on either a full-time or part-time basis in a long-term care facility or does not have care or custody of an elder or dependent adult shall not be responsible for reporting abuse or neglect that is not reasonably observable or discernible to a reasonably prudent person having no specialized training or experience in elder or dependent care.

(3) (A) A mandated reporter who is a physician and surgeon, a registered nurse, or a psychotherapist, as defined in Section 1010 of the Evidence Code, shall not be required to report, pursuant to paragraph (1), an incident if all of the following conditions exist:

(i) The mandated reporter has been told by an elder or dependent adult that they have experienced behavior constituting physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63, abandonment, abduction, isolation, financial abuse, or neglect.

(ii) The mandated reporter is unaware of any independent evidence that corroborates the statement that the abuse has occurred.

(iii) The elder or dependent adult has been diagnosed with a mental illness or dementia, or is the subject of a court-ordered conservatorship because of a mental illness or dementia.

(iv) In the exercise of clinical judgment, the physician and surgeon, the registered nurse, or the psychotherapist, as defined in Section 1010 of the Evidence Code, reasonably believes that the abuse did not occur.

(B) This paragraph shall not impose upon mandated reporters a duty to investigate a known or suspected incident of abuse and shall not lessen or restrict any existing duty of mandated reporters.

(4) (A) In a long-term care facility, a mandated reporter shall not be required to report as a suspected incident of abuse, as defined in Section 15610.07, an incident if all of the following conditions exist:

(i) The mandated reporter is aware that there is a proper plan of care.

(ii) The mandated reporter is aware that the plan of care was properly provided or executed.

(iii) A physical, mental, or medical injury occurred as a result of care provided pursuant to clause (i) or
 (ii).

(iv) The mandated reporter reasonably believes that the injury was not the result of abuse.

(B) This paragraph shall neither require a mandated reporter to seek, nor preclude a mandated reporter from seeking, information regarding a known or suspected incident of abuse before reporting. This paragraph shall apply only to those categories of mandated reporters that the State Department of Public Health determines, upon approval by the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse and the state long-term care ombudsman, have access to plans of care and have the training and experience necessary to determine whether the conditions specified in this section have been met.

(c) (1) Any mandated reporter who has knowledge, or reasonably suspects, that types of elder or dependent adult abuse for
 which reports are not mandated have been inflicted upon an elder or dependent adult, or that their emotional well-being is endangered in any other way, may report the known or suspected instance of abuse.

(2) If the suspected or alleged abuse occurred in a long-term care facility other than a state mental health hospital or a state developmental center, the report may be made to the long-term care ombudsman program. Except in an emergency, the local ombudsman shall report any case of known or suspected abuse to the State Department of Public Health and any case of known or suspected criminal activity to the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse, as soon as is practicable.

(3) If the suspected or alleged abuse occurred in a state mental health hospital or a state developmental center, the report may be made to the designated investigator of the State Department of State
 Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services or to a local law enforcement agency. Except in an emergency, the local law enforcement agency shall report any case of known or suspected criminal activity to the Division of Medi-Cal Fraud and Elder Abuse, as soon as is practicable.

(4) If the suspected or alleged abuse occurred in a place other than a place described in paragraph (2) or (3), the report may be made to the county adult protective services agency.

(5) If the conduct involves criminal activity not covered in subdivision (b), it may be immediately reported to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

(d) If two or more mandated reporters are present and jointly have knowledge or reasonably suspect that types of abuse of an elder or a dependent adult for which a report is or is not mandated have
 occurred, and there is agreement among them, the telephone report or internet report, as authorized by Section 15658, may be made by a member of the team selected by mutual agreement, and a single report may be made and signed by the selected member of the reporting team. Any member who has knowledge that the member designated to report has failed to do so shall thereafter make the report.

(e) A telephone report or internet report, as authorized by Section 15658, of a known or suspected instance of elder or dependent adult abuse shall include, if known, the name of the person making the report, the name and age of the elder or dependent adult, the present location of the elder or dependent adult, the names and addresses of family members or any other adult responsible for the elder’s or dependent adult’s care, the nature and extent of the elder’s or dependent adult’s condition, the date of the incident, and any other information, including
 information that led that person to suspect elder or dependent adult abuse, as requested by the agency receiving the report.

(f) The reporting duties under this section are individual, and no supervisor or administrator shall impede or inhibit the reporting duties, and no person making the report shall be subject to any sanction for making the report. However, internal procedures to facilitate reporting, ensure confidentiality, and apprise supervisors and administrators of reports may be established, provided they are not inconsistent with this chapter.

(g) (1) Whenever this section requires a county adult protective services agency to report to a law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency shall, immediately upon request, provide a copy of its investigative report concerning the reported matter to that county adult protective services agency.

(2) Whenever this section requires a law enforcement agency to report to a county adult protective services agency, the county adult protective services agency shall, immediately upon request, provide to that law enforcement agency a copy of its investigative report concerning the reported matter.
